test/src/morphology/N-aaiga_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - āiga: # Noun 33 'eng /est aeg/fin' - full paradigm
     āiga+N+Sg+Nom: āiga
     āiga+N+Sg+Gen: āiga
     āiga+N+Sg+Par: aigõ
     āiga+N+Sg+Dat: āigan
     āiga+N+Sg+Ins: āigaks
     āiga+N+Sg+Ill: aigõ
     āiga+N+Sg+Ela: āigast
     āiga+N+Pl+Nom: āigad
     āiga+N+Pl+Gen: āigad
     āiga+N+Pl+Par: aigi
     āiga+N+Pl+Dat: āigadõn
     āiga+N+Pl+Ins: āigadõks
     āiga+N+Pl+Ill: [aigži, āigiž]
     āiga+N+Pl+Ela: [āigist, aigšti]
